Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3919.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 171.07, subdivision 15, is amended to read: Subd. 15. Veteran designation. (a) At the request of an eligible applicant and on payment of the required fee, the department must issue, renew, or reissue to the applicant a driver's license or Minnesota identification card bearing a graphic or written designation of: (1) Veteran; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (2) Veteran 100% T&Pnew text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (3) SGU Veterannew text end . (b) At the time of the initial application for the designation provided under this subdivision, the applicant must: (1) be one of the following: (i) a veteran, as defined in section 197.447; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (ii) a retired or honorably discharged member of the National Guard or a reserve component of the United States armed forces;new text begin ornew text end new text begin (iii) a veteran of the Secret War in Laos, as defined in section 197.448, subdivision 1, paragraph (e); new text end (2) provide a certified copy of the applicant's discharge papers that confirms an honorable or general discharge under honorable conditions status, deleted text begin ordeleted text end a military retiree identification card,new text begin anew text end veteran identification card, deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin a new text end veteran health identification cardnew text begin , or an eligibility certificate under section 197.448 if the applicant seeks the designation under paragraph (a), clause (3)new text end ; and (3) if the applicant is seeking the disability designation under paragraph (a), clause (2), provide satisfactory evidence of a 100 percent total and permanent service-connected disability as determined by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective June 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 197.236, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Burial fees. (a) The commissioner of veterans affairs shall establish a fee schedule, which may be adjusted from time to time, for the interment of eligible spouses and dependent childrennew text begin and eligible veterans of the Secret War in Laos, as defined in section 197.448, subdivision 1new text end . The fees shall cover as nearly as practicable the actual costs of interment, excluding the value of the plot. (b) Upon application, the commissioner may waive or reduce the burial fee for an indigent eligible person. The commissioner shall maintain a policy, eligibility standards, and application form for requests to waive or reduce the burial fee to indigent eligible applicants. (c) No plot or interment fees may be charged for the burial of service members who die on active duty or eligible veterans, as defined in United States Code, title 38, section 2402, paragraph (a), subparagraphs 1 to 4 and 7. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 197.448, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definition. deleted text begin As used indeleted text end new text begin (a) For purposes ofnew text end this section, the deleted text begin termdeleted text end new text begin following terms have the meanings given.new text end new text begin (b) "Commissioner" has the meaning given in section 197.61, subdivision 2, paragraph (c). new text end new text begin (c) "Department" has the meaning given in section 197.61, subdivision 2, paragraph (e). new text end new text begin (d) "VA" has the meaning given in section 197.61, subdivision 2, paragraph (g). new text end new text begin (e)new text end "Veteran of the Secret War in Laos" new text begin or "SGU veteran" new text end means a person who resides in Minnesota and who: (1) was naturalized as provided in section 2(1) of the federal Hmong Veterans' Naturalization Act of 2000, Public Law 106-207; or (2) is a person who the commissioner of veterans affairs determines served honorably with a special guerrilla unit or with irregular forces that operated from a base in Laos in support of the armed forces of the United States at any time during the period beginning February 28, 1961, and ending May 14, 1975, and is a citizen of the United States or an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 197.448, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Eligibility for benefits and privileges. (a) A veteran of the Secret War in Laos, as defined in subdivision 1,new text begin paragraph (e),new text end clause (1), is entitled to the benefits and privileges listed in paragraph (d) on July 2, 2025. (b) A veteran of the Secret War in Laos, as defined in subdivision 1,new text begin paragraph (e),new text end clause (2), is entitled to the benefits and privileges listed in paragraph (d) after the commissioner of veterans affairs verifies the person's veteran status. deleted text begin The commissioner must not begin accepting applications for verification under this paragraph until the legislature enacts criteria and a protocol to determine:deleted text end deleted text begin (1) which Minnesotans served in special guerilla units or with irregular forces in Laos; and deleted text end deleted text begin (2) which of the Minnesotans who served in special guerilla units or with irregular forces in Laos are deserving of Minnesota veterans benefits. deleted text end (c) If the commissioner verifies a person's status as a veteran of the Secret War in Laos, the commissioner must provide the person with a certificate of eligibility for the benefits and privileges listed in paragraph (d) on a form developed by the commissioner for this purpose. The commissioner must develop the form required under this paragraph no later than September 15, 2025. (d) The following statutory benefits and privileges available to a veteran, as defined in section 197.447, are also available to a veteran of the Secret War in Laos: deleted text begin section 171.07, subdivision 15 (veteran designation on drivers' licenses and state identification cards);deleted text end new text begin section 43A.09 (civil service recruitment); section 43A.11 (veterans preference in state employment); section 43A.111 (certain disabled veterans);new text end section 197.23 (purchase of grave markers); section 197.231 (honor guards); section 197.236 (state veterans cemeteries); section 197.455 (veterans preference); section 197.4551 (permissive preference for veterans in private employment); new text begin section 197.46 (writ of mandamus); section 197.48 (application); section 197.481 (enforcement by commissioner); and new text end section 197.63 (vital records, certified copies)deleted text begin ; section 197.65 (renewal of professional licenses, motor vehicle registration, and drivers' licenses); and section 197.987 (honor and remember flag)deleted text end . Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 197.448, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Eligibility determination. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner must establish an application process to determine a veteran's eligibility for the benefits in subdivision 2, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (b) To establish eligibility, an applicant must submit a completed application for pre-need determination of eligibility for burial in a VA national cemetery. County veteran service officers and the commissioner must provide assistance to applicants filling out the application. The commissioner must make copies of the application and any successor form available on the department's website and at the department's offices. new text end new text begin (c) After the VA makes a determination on the application, the applicant must submit the determination to the commissioner. If the VA determines that an applicant is eligible to receive benefits under subdivision 2, paragraph (d), the commissioner must issue a certificate of eligibility to the applicant for the benefits and privileges under subdivision 2, paragraph (d). new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 197.448, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Special consideration. new text end new text begin (a) If the VA determines that an applicant is not eligible, the applicant may request special consideration from the commissioner. The commissioner must establish a process to request special consideration consistent with the requirements of this subdivision. The commissioner must make applicable forms to request special consideration available on the department's website and at certain department offices. new text end new text begin (b) An applicant seeking special consideration under this subdivision must submit the following to the commissioner: new text end new text begin (1) documentation from the VA regarding the determination of ineligibility; and new text end new text begin (2) at least two different forms of documentation supporting the applicant's claim of veteran status, which may include: new text end new text begin (i) original service-related documents; new text end new text begin (ii) an affidavit from a commissioned officer, noncommissioned officer, or other member of the applicant's chain of command who has direct knowledge of the applicant's service; new text end new text begin (iii) two affidavits from individuals who served with the applicant in a special guerrilla unit or irregular force and who have personal knowledge of the applicant's service; or new text end new text begin (iv) other appropriate and relevant proof of the applicant's service as determined by the commissioner, including but not limited to: new text end new text begin (A) photographs taken during the applicant's service in Laos; new text end new text begin (B) newspaper articles featuring or citing the applicant's service in a special guerrilla unit or irregular force; new text end new text begin (C) certificates of membership from a veteran's organization such as the Lao-Hmong American Coalition; Lao Veterans of America; SGU Veterans and Families of USA, Inc.; and Royal Lao Armed Forces and SGU; new text end new text begin (D) congressional recognition certificates; new text end new text begin (E) certificates of training; new text end new text begin (F) letters of commendation; or new text end new text begin (G) an affidavit from a case officer or former case officer in the United States intelligence services. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner must review an application for special consideration submitted under this subdivision. The commissioner may request additional information from an applicant to validate the contents of an application for special consideration. If the commissioner determines that an applicant is eligible to receive benefits under subdivision 2, paragraph (d), the commissioner must issue a certificate of eligibility to the applicant for the benefits and privileges under subdivision 2, paragraph (d). new text end new text begin (d) If an application for special consideration is denied by the commissioner, an applicant may request a contested case hearing to challenge the commissioner's denial by filing a request with the commissioner within 60 days of the date of the denial notice. The request must state specific reasons for contesting the denial. A contested case hearing on a timely and properly filed request must be conducted according to the procedures in sections 14.57 to 14.62. new text end new text begin (e) The deadline to submit an application for eligibility under this subdivision is December 31, 2030. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin CANCELLATION.new text end new text begin The appropriation under Laws 2025, chapter 30, article 1, section 3, subdivision 2, paragraph (p), is canceled to the general fund by June 30, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 8. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SGU VETERANS.new text end new text begin (a) $59,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of veterans affairs for staffing costs related to this act. new text end new text begin (b) $141,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for the purposes of section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 9. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE.new text end new text begin Except as provided otherwise, this act is effective August 1, 2026. new text end